California, session 20252026, AB1142.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 24001 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:24001. For purposes of this chapter:(a) “Event” means a public equine event or public horse sale that is held in the state, including a cutting horse competition, an endurance riding competition, a competitive trail competition, or any other competition as determined by the department by regulation.(b) An equine event that is subject to this chapter shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Money, goods, or services are exchanged for the right to compete.(2) Individuals compete for a single set of placings, points, or awards at the equine event.(3) (A) For one-day events, the entry fee to enter a single class exceeds fifteen dollars ($15) and either no other fees are charged or other fees charged exceed sixty dollars ($60). Fees charged may include ground fees, stall fees, or any other fees composed of money, goods, or services assessed to permit competitors to enter into the event.(B) The secretary may, by regulation, increase the amounts specified in subparagraph (A), in consultation with the advisory committee appointed pursuant to Section 24013.5.(c) Sales that are subject to this chapter are public sales that permit a horse to be consigned for public sale.(d) The following events are excluded from this chapter:(1) Competitions subject to the jurisdiction of the California Horse Racing Board.(2) Sales consisting solely of racing stock.(3) Parade horse competitions.(4) A timed rodeo-related performance competition when held apart from a horse show, including, but not limited to, rodeo, roping club, cattle team penning, barrel racing, and gymkhana.(e) “Event manager” means the person in charge of an event, including the entity or individual financially responsible for the event that is responsible for registering the event with the department, and who is responsible for the assessment, collection, and remittance of fees. “Event manager” includes horse show secretaries and managers, competitive event managers, and horse sale managers and sale owners.(f) “Horse” means all horses, mules, and asses.(g) “Licensed veterinarian” means a person licensed as a veterinarian by the State of California.(h) “Prohibited substance” means a stimulant, depressant, tranquilizer, anesthetic, including any local anesthetic, sedative analgesic, corticosteroid, anabolic steroid, or agent that would sore a horse, that could affect the performance, soundness, or disposition of a horse, or any drug, regardless of how harmless or innocuous it might otherwise be, that could interfere with the detection of any prohibited substance, including any metabolite or derivative of any prohibited substance.(i) “Permissible substance” means a substance for which the department has established a limitation on dosage or a maximum permissible detectable level for the purposes provided in Section 24000.(j) “Therapeutic administration” means the administration of a drug, medicine, or other substance that is necessary for the treatment of an illness or injury diagnosed by a licensed veterinarian. The administration of a prescription drug, medicine, or other substance shall only be as given or prescribed by the licensed veterinarian. The administration of a nonprescription drug, medicine, or other substance shall be in accordance with the directions on the manufacturer’s label.(k) “Exempt medication” means an oral or topical medication containing prohibited substances determined by the department to be exempt from this chapter when administered therapeutically.(l) “Public equine event” means a horse show or competition that permits a person to enter a horse for show or competition in exchange for money, goods, or services. Any club or group that permits people to join or enter into competition in exchange for money, goods, or services, is “public” for purposes of this chapter.(m) “Public horse sale” is a sale that consigns a horse in exchange for money, goods, or services, excluding sales consisting solely of racing stock.(n) “Stimulant or depressant” means a medication that stimulates or depresses the circulatory, respiratory, or central or peripheral nervous system.(o) To “sore” means to apply an irritating or blistering agent internally or externally for the purpose of affecting the performance, soundness, or disposition of a horse.(p) “Trainer” means a person who has the responsibility for the care, training, custody, or performance of a horse, including, but not limited to, a person who signs any entry blank of a public equine event or public horse sale, whether that person is an owner, rider, agent, coach, adult, or minor.